District of Columbia statutes.
2-1302

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Office” means the Office on Latino Affairs created by § 2-1311.

(2)

“Director” means the Executive Director of the Office on Latino Affairs.

(3)

“Commission” means the Commission on Latino Community Development created by § 2-1321.

(4)

“Latino” or “Latino community” shall mean the people of Spanish origin who are residents of the District of Columbia.

(5)

“Services to the Latino community” means those services designed to provide assistance, including but not limited to, nutritional programs, transportation services, health and financial assistance, employment and housing programs, recreational opportunities, information, referral, and counseling services.

(6)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title II, § 201, 23 DCR 2543

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2302.
1973 Ed., § 6-1902.